Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-231
Board; investigations; matters to be considered.

In making any investigation as to conditions existing in the barber trade, the board shall give due consideration to (1) the costs incurred in the particular county under investigation with regard to the adequacy of the income of barber shop operators to assure full compliance with all sanitary regulations imposed by any law of this state and (2) healthful working conditions in barber shops.

Laws 1945, c. 174, § 4(4), p. 556;

Laws 1957, c. 294, § 12, p. 1059.